Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Chapter 37. Acquisition of Real Property Using Public Funds

§ 43-37-1.
Title; applicability.

This chapter shall be known as the “Real Property Acquisition Policies Law.”

The provisions of this chapter shall be applicable to the acquisition of real property under the laws of this state for use in any project or program in which public funds are used.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2749-51; Laws, 1972, ch. 525, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 426, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1996).

§ 43-37-2.
Definitions.

The words and terms defined in Section 43-39-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall, unless the context otherwise clearly requires, also have the same meanings whenever such words and terms appear in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 457, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1989).

§ 43-37-3.
Acquisition of real property in publicly funded projects.

Any person, agency or other entity acquiring real property for any project or program in which public funds are used shall comply with the following policies:

Every reasonable effort shall be made to acquire expeditiously real property by negotiation.

Real property shall be appraised before the initiation of negotiations, except that the acquiring person, agency or other entity may adopt a procedure in compliance with federal regulations to waive the appraisal in cases involving the acquisition by sale or donation of property with a low fair market value. For the purposes of this chapter, property with a low fair market value is property with a fair market value of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) or less. The owner or his designated representative shall be given an opportunity to accompany the appraiser during his inspection of the property.

Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the price that shall be paid for real property shall be the lesser of the best negotiated price or the approved appraisal of the fair market value or the price at which the property is offered for sale. Any decrease or increase in the fair market value of real property prior to the date of valuation caused by the public improvement for which the property is acquired or by the likelihood that the property would be acquired for such improvement, other than that due to physical deterioration within the reasonable control of the owner, will be disregarded in determining the compensation for the property. The owner of the real property to be acquired shall be provided with a written statement of, and summary of the basis for, the amount established as just compensation. Where appropriate, the just compensation for the real property acquired and for damages to remaining real property shall be separately stated.

The purchase price for real property may exceed the amount offered as just compensation for the property when reasonable efforts to negotiate an agreement at that amount have failed, and the person, agency or other entity seeking to acquire the property approves an administrative settlement as reasonable, prudent and in the best interests of the public. When state funds pay for all or a portion of the acquisition, the purchasing person, agency or other entity shall prepare a written statement explaining the reasons that justified the purchase price exceeding the amount offered as just compensation, including any anticipated trial risks, and any available information supporting an administrative settlement.

No owner shall be required to surrender possession of real property before the agreed purchase price is paid or there is deposited with the state court, in accordance with applicable law, for the benefit of the owner an amount not less than the approved appraisal of the fair market value of such property, or the amount of the award of compensation in the condemnation proceeding of such property.

The construction or development of a public improvement shall be so scheduled that, to the greatest extent practicable, no person lawfully occupying real property shall be required to move from a dwelling (assuming a replacement dwelling will be available) or to move his business or farm operation without at least ninety (90) days’ written notice from the date by which such move is required.

If an owner or tenant is permitted to occupy the real property acquired on a rental basis for a short term or for a period subject to termination by the acquiring authority on short notice, the amount of rent required shall not exceed the fair rental value of the property to a short-term occupier.

In no event shall the time of condemnation be advanced, or negotiations or condemnation and the deposit of funds in court for the use of the owner be deferred, or any other coercive action be taken to compel an agreement on the price to be paid for the property.

If an interest in real property is to be acquired by exercise of power of eminent domain, formal condemnation proceedings shall be instituted. The acquiring authority shall not intentionally make it necessary for an owner to institute legal proceedings to prove the fact of the taking of his real property.

If the acquisition of only part of the property would leave its owner with an uneconomic remnant, an offer to acquire that remnant shall be made. For the purposes of this chapter, an uneconomic remnant is a parcel of real property in which the owner is left with an interest after the partial acquisition of the owner’s property and which the person, agency or other entity acquiring the property determines has little or no value or utility to the owner.

A person whose real property is being acquired in accordance with this chapter may, after the person has been fully informed of his right to receive just compensation for such property, donate such property, any part thereof, any interest therein or any compensation paid therefor to the person, agency or other entity acquiring the property in such manner as he so determines.

Any real property acquired by any person, agency or other entity using public funds in accordance with Section 57-75-37(3) or Section 57-75-37(4) shall be exempt from the provisions of subsection (1)(b) and (c) of this section to the extent permitted by Section 57-75-37(3) or Section 57-75-37(4).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2749-55; Laws, 1972, ch. 525, § 5; Laws, 1989, ch. 457, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 418 § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 426, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 339, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 531, § 1; Laws, 2013, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 12; Laws, 2016, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 8, 2016).

§ 43-37-5.
Reimbursement of owner for expenses.

Any person, agency or other entity acquiring real property for such use shall as soon as practicable after the date of payment of the purchase price or the date of deposit into court of funds to satisfy the award of compensation in a condemnation proceeding to acquire real property, whichever is the earlier, reimburse the owner, to the extent that the state deems fair and reasonable, for expenses he necessarily incurred for (a) recording fees, transfer taxes and similar expenses incidental to conveying such real property to the state; (b) penalty costs for prepayment for any preexisting recorded mortgage entered into in good faith encumbering such real property; and (c) the pro rata portion of real property taxes paid which are allocable to a period subsequent to the date of vesting title in the state, or the effective date of possession of such real property by the state, whichever is the earlier.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2749-52; Laws, 1972, ch. 525, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 43-37-7.
Reimbursement of fees where condemnation not completed.

Where a condemnation proceeding is instituted by the state, or a subdivision thereof, for a project which is funded in whole or in part by federal funds to acquire real property for such use and (a) the final judgment is that the real property cannot be acquired by condemnation or (b) the proceeding is abandoned, the owner of any right, title or interest in such real property shall be paid such sum as will, in the opinion of the state or the subdivision thereof, reimburse such owner for his reasonable attorney, appraisal and engineering fees, actually incurred because of the condemnation proceedings. The award of such sums will be paid by the person, agency or other entity which sought to condemn the property.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2749-53; Laws, 1972, ch. 525, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 43-37-9.
Reimbursement of expenses in cases of inverse condemnation.

Where an inverse condemnation proceeding is instituted by the owner of any right, title or interest in real property because of use of his property in any program or project in which federal and/or federal-aid funds are used, the court, rendering a judgment for the plaintiff in such proceeding and awarding compensation for the taking of property, or the state’s attorney effecting a settlement of any such proceeding, shall determine and award or allow to such plaintiff, as a part of such judgment or settlement, such sum as will, in the opinion of the court or the state’s attorney, reimburse such plaintiff for his reasonable costs, disbursements and expenses, including reasonable attorney, appraisal and engineering fees, actually incurred because of such proceeding.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2749-54; Laws, 1972, ch. 525, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 43-37-11.
Buildings, structures and improvements to be acquired with land.

Where any interest in real property is acquired, an equal interest in all buildings, structures, or other improvements located upon the real property so acquired and which are required to be removed from such real property or which are determined to be adversely affected by the use to which such real property will be put shall be acquired.

For the purpose of determining the just compensation to be paid for any building, structure or other improvement required to be acquired as above set forth, such building, structure or other improvement shall be deemed to be a part of the real property to be acquired notwithstanding the right or obligation of a tenant, as against the owner of any other interest in the real property, to remove such building or improvement at the expiration of his term. The fair market value which such building, structure or improvement contributes to the fair market value of the real property to be acquired, or the fair market value of such building, structure or improvement for removal from the real property, whichever is the greater, shall be paid to the tenant therefor.

Payment for such buildings, structures or improvements as set forth above shall not result in duplication of any payments otherwise authorized by state law. No such payment shall be made unless the owner of the land involved disclaims all interest in the improvements of the tenant. In consideration for any such payment, the tenant shall assign, transfer and release all his right, title and interest in and to such improvements. Nothing with regard to the above-mentioned acquisition of buildings, structures or other improvements shall be construed to deprive the tenant of any rights to reject payment and to obtain payment for such property interests in accordance with the laws of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2749-56; Laws, 1972, ch. 525, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 43-37-13.
Payments as additives to compensation otherwise provided by law.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as creating in any condemnation proceedings brought under the power of eminent domain any element of value or damages not in existence immediately prior to July 1, 1972, but such payments shall be considered only as additives to due compensation otherwise provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2749-57; Laws, 1972, ch. 525, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1972.